Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 107
CRIMINAL OFFENSES

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2003. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

11-107-101. Unauthorized conduct of banking business.

It is a criminal offense for any person not authorized to carry on a banking business under this code, falsely and with intent to defraud, to act as a bank or to represent that he or she is or is acting for a bank or to use an artificial or corporate name that is the name of a bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1135, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-102. Receipt of deposits while insolvent.

It is a criminal offense if a state bank receives any deposit while insolvent, or an officer, director, or employee knows or, in the proper performance of his or her duty should know, of such insolvency and receives or authorizes the receipt of such deposit, or if such state bank or person has knowingly concealed or misstated material facts regarding the insolvency of the state bank from or to the banking board, commissioner, or division of banking.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1135, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-103. Unlawful service as officer or director.

It is a criminal offense for any person to serve as an officer or director of a state bank, or serve as commissioner, deputy commissioner, or employee of the division:

Who has been convicted of an unpardoned offense constituting, in the jurisdiction in which the conviction was had, a violation of the banking laws, a felony involving moral turpitude, or a breach of trust;

Who is indebted to the bank for more than thirty days upon a judgment that has become final.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1135, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-104. Unlawful gratuity, compensation, or transactions.

It is a criminal offense for an affiliate of a state bank or for an officer, director, or employee of a state bank or affiliate of a state bank:

To solicit, accept, or agree to accept, directly or indirectly, from any person other than the institution, any gratuity, compensation, or other personal benefit for any action taken by the institution, or for endeavoring to procure any such action;

To have any interest, direct or indirect, in the purchase at less than its face value of any evidence of indebtedness issued by the institution.

In this section and section 11-105-101 (5), the term "affiliate" of a state bank shall include:

Any person who holds a majority of the stock of the bank or has been determined by the banking board to hold a controlling interest therein, any other corporation in which such person owns a majority of the stock, and any partnership in which such person has an interest;

Any corporation in which the state bank or an officer, director, or employee thereof holds a majority of the stock and any partnership in which such person has an interest;

Any corporation of which a majority of the directors are officers, directors, or employees of the state bank or of which officers, directors, trustees, or employees constitute a majority of the directors of the state bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1135, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-105. Unlawful concealment of transactions.

It is a criminal offense for an officer, director, employee, attorney, or agent of a state bank:

To conceal, or endeavor to conceal, any transaction of the bank from any officer, director, or employee of the bank or any official or employee of the division to whom it should properly be disclosed;

With intent to deceive, to make any false or misleading statement or entry, or omit any statement or entry that should be made in any book, account, report, or statement of the institution.

No bank shall sell, assign, or transfer any of its assets when insolvent, or in contemplation of insolvency with the intent of preferring any credit, or preventing the application of such assets to the subrogation of its debts; nor shall any officer, director, or employee of any bank personally authorize or permit the same to be done.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1136, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-106. Unlawful payment of penalties and judgment against others.

It is a criminal offense for a state bank to pay a fine, or penalty imposed by law upon any other person, or any judgment against such person, or to reimburse directly or indirectly any person by whom such fine, penalty, or judgment has been paid, except in settlement of its own liability or in connection with the acquisition of property against which such judgment is a lien or as provided in section 11-103-602.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1136, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-107. Embezzlement or misapplication of funds.

It is a criminal offense for any officer, director, shareholder, or employee of any bank to directly or indirectly embezzle, abstract, or misapply, or cause to be embezzled, abstracted, or misapplied, any of the funds or securities or other property of or under the control of the bank with intent to deceive, injure, cheat, wrong, or defraud any person.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1136, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-108. Unlawful acts or omissions - penalties.

Any person responsible for an act or omission expressly declared to be a criminal offense by this code:

Commits a class 2 misdemeanor;

If the act or omission was intended to defraud, commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

An officer, director, employee, agent, or attorney of a state bank shall be criminally responsible for an act or omission of the institution declared to be a criminal offense by this code if, knowing that such act or omission is a criminal offense, he or she participates in authorizing, executing, ratifying, or concealing such act or in authorizing or ratifying such omission or, having a duty to take the required action, omits to do so.

Unless otherwise provided in this code, it is no defense to a criminal prosecution under this code that the defendant did not know the facts establishing the criminal character of the act or omission charged, if the defendant could and should have known such facts in the proper performance of his or her duty.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1137, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3152, § 131, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor, see § 18-1.3-501.

11-107-109. Unlawful acts or failure to perform - penalty.

Any person who willfully or knowingly fails to perform any act required, and as required by section 11-102-102 (10) or 11-102-501, or who commits any act in violation of said sections commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1137, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-20-117 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-110. Injunction.

If a violation of this code by a state bank or an officer, director, or employee thereof is threatened or impending and may cause substantial injury to the institution or to the depositors, creditors, or stockholders thereof, the district court in and for the county in which the bank is located may, upon the suit of the banking board, issue an injunction restraining such violation.

If any person, not authorized to carry on a banking business under this code, falsely acts as a bank, or falsely represents that such person is acting for a bank, or uses an artificial or corporate name that is the name of a bank, the said district court may, upon the suit of the banking board, issue an injunction restraining such act.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1137, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-107-111. General corporation laws applicable.

The provisions of articles 30 to 52, 101 to 117, and 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S., relating to corporations and nonprofit corporations shall, insofar as the same are not inconsistent with this code, govern corporations and nonprofit corporations operating under the provisions of this code.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1137, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-11-110 as it existed prior to 2003.